Washington statutes.
RCW 19.52.036

Application of consumer protection act.

Entering into or transacting a usurious contract is hereby declared to be an unfair act or practice in the conduct of commerce for the purpose of the application of the consumer protection act found in chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 23 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—1967 ex.s. c 23: See notes following RCW 19.52.005.